California statutes. Insurance Code
(b) Any life or disability insurer that violates Section 10140 is liable for administrative penalties of not more than two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) for the first violation and not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000) for each subsequent violation.

(c) Any life or disability insurer that violates Section 10140 with a frequency that indicates a general business practice or commits a knowing violation of that section, is liable for administrative penalties of not less than fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000) and not more than one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) for each violation.

(d) An act or omission that is inadvertent and that results in incorrect premium rates being charged to more than one subscriber shall be a single violation for the purpose of this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 695, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

10141.

No application for insurance or insurance investigation report furnished by such an insurer to its agents or employees for use in determining the insurability of the applicant shall carry any identification, or any requirement therefor, of the applicant’s race, color, religion, ancestry, national origin, or sexual orientation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 682, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

10142.

Nothing in this article shall prohibit use in an application for life or disability insurance of a question asking for the birthplace of an applicant if such question is used only to identify the applicant and not to discriminate against him.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 50.)
-------------------------------------------

10143.

(a) No insurance company licensed in this state shall refuse to issue or sell or renew any policy of life or disability insurance after appropriate application solely by reason of the fact that the person to be insured carries a gene which may, under some circumstances, be associated with disability in that person’s offspring, but which causes no adverse effects on the carrier. Such genes shall include, but not be limited to, Tay-Sachs trait, sickle cell trait, thalassemia trait, and X-linked hemophilia A. No such policy issued and delivered in this state to any association, corporation, firm, fund, individual, group, order, organization, society, or trust subject to the supervision of the commissioner shall demand or require a higher premium rate or charge by reason of the fact that the person to be insured carries such traits than is at that time required of any other association, corporation, firm, fund, individual, group, order, organization, society, or trust in an otherwise identical classification, nor shall any association, corporation, firm, fund, group, individual, order, organization, society, or trust make or require any rebate, discrimination, or discount upon the amount to be paid or the service to be rendered on such policy because the person to be insured carries such traits.

(b) No insurance company licensed in this state shall insert in a policy of life or disability insurance any condition, nor make any stipulation, whereby the person insured who carries a gene which may, under some circumstances, be associated with disability in that person’s offspring, but which causes no adverse effects on the carrier, including, but not limited to, Tay-Sachs trait, sickle cell trait, thalassemia trait, and X-linked hemophilia A, shall bind himself, his heirs, executors, administrators, or assignees to accept any sum or service less than the full value or amount of the policy in case of a claim accruing thereon other than such as are imposed upon other persons in similar cases and any such stipulation or condition so made or inserted shall be void.

(c) No insurance company licensed in this state shall fix any lower rate in the fees or commissions of agents or brokers for writing or renewing a policy of life or disability insurance solely because the applicant carries a gene which may, under some circumstances, be associated with disability in that person’s offspring, but which causes no adverse effects on the carrier. Such genes shall include, but are not limited to, Tay-Sachs trait, sickle cell trait, or X-linked hemophilia A.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 732.)
-------------------------------------------

10144.

No insurer issuing, providing, or administering any contract of individual or group insurance providing life, annuity, or disability benefits applied for and issued on or after January 1, 1984, shall refuse to insure, or refuse to continue to insure, or limit the amount, extent, or kind of coverage available to an individual, or charge a different rate for the same coverage solely because of a physical or mental impairment, except where the refusal, limitation or rate differential is based on sound actuarial principles or is related to actual and reasonably anticipated experience.

“Physical or mental impairment” means any physical, sensory, or mental impairment which substantially limits one or more of that person’s major life activities.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 971, Sec. 1.5.)
-------------------------------------------

10144.1.

A disability insurer that denies coverage for an experimental medical procedure or plan of treatment for a claimant with a terminal illness, which for the purposes of this section refers to an incurable or irreversible condition that has a high probability of causing death within one year or less, under a disability insurance policy that includes hospital, medical, or surgical coverage issued in this state shall provide written notification directly to the claimant or representative, which shall include all of the following:

(a) The specific medical and scientific reasons for the denial and specific references to pertinent policy provisions upon which the denial is based.

(b) A description of the alternative medical procedures or treatments covered by the policy, if any. Compliance with this subdivision by an insurer shall not be construed to mean that the insurer is engaging in the unlawful practice of medicine.

(c) A description of the process by which the claimant or representative may exercise his or her right to appeal the denial and obtain and participate in a review of the information provided to the claimant or representative pursuant to subdivisions (a) and (b). The review shall not be limited to written communication and shall be provided by the appropriate named fiduciary or his or her designee rendering the decision. The review shall be provided to the claimant within 30 calendar days following the receipt of the request for review. However, the review required by this section shall be held within five business days if the treating physician determines, in consultation with the medical director of the insurer, based on standard medical practice, that the effectiveness of either the proposed treatment, services, or supplies or any alternative treatment, services, or supplies covered by the policy, would be materially reduced if not provided at the earliest possible date.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 582, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

10144.2.

(a) No disability insurer covering hospital, medical, or surgical expenses shall deny, refuse to insure, refuse to renew, cancel, restrict, or otherwise terminate, exclude, or limit coverage or charge a different rate for the same coverage, on the basis that the applicant or insured person is, has been, or may be a victim of domestic violence.

(b) Nothing in this section shall prevent a disability insurer covering hospital, medical, or surgical expenses from underwriting coverage on the basis of the medical condition of an individual so long as the consideration of the condition (1) does not take into account whether such an individual’s medical condition was caused by an act of domestic violence, (2) is the same with respect to an applicant or insured who is not the subject of domestic violence as with an applicant or insured who is the subject of domestic violence, and (3) does not violate any other act, regulation, or rule of law. The fact that an individual is, has been, or may be the subject of domestic violence shall not be considered a medical condition.

(c) As used in this section, “domestic violence” means domestic violence, as defined in Section 6211 of the Family Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 603, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

10144.3.

(a) No admitted insurer licensed to issue life insurance shall refuse to accept an application for insurance, refuse to issue or renew a policy, cancel a policy, or deny coverage under a policy because the applicant for insurance or any person who is or would be insured is, or has been, a victim of domestic violence.

(b) Nothing in this section shall prevent a life insurer from taking any of the actions set forth in subdivision (a) on the basis of criteria not otherwise made invalid by this section or any other act, regulation, or rule of law. If discrimination by a life insurer is not in violation of this section but is based on any other criteria that are allowable by law, the fact that the applicant or insured is, has been, or may be the subject of domestic violence shall be irrelevant.

(c) Nothing in this section shall require a life insurer to pay for any loss if that payment is prohibited by Section 533.

(d) As used in this section, “domestic violence” means domestic violence as defined in Section 6211 of the Family Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 176, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

10144.4.

(a) A large group health insurance policy shall provide all covered mental health and substance use disorder benefits in compliance with the federal Paul Wellstone and Pete Domenici Mental Health Parity and Addiction Equity Act of 2008 (Public Law 110-343) and all rules, regulations, and guidance issued pursuant to Section 2726 of the federal Public Health Service Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 300gg-26).

(b) An individual or small group health insurance policy shall provide all covered mental health and substance use disorder benefits in compliance with the
 federal Paul Wellstone and Pete Domenici Mental Health Parity and Addiction Equity Act of 2008 (Public Law 110-343), all rules, regulations, and guidance issued pursuant to Section 2726 of the federal Public Health Service Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 300gg-26), and Section 10112.27.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 162, Sec. 1.   (SB 374)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

10144.5.

(a) (1) Every disability insurance policy issued, amended, or renewed on or after January 1, 2021, that provides hospital, medical, or surgical coverage shall provide coverage for medically necessary treatment of mental health and substance use disorders, under the same terms and conditions applied to other medical conditions as specified in subdivision (c).

(2) For purposes of this section, “mental health and substance use disorders” means a mental health condition or substance use disorder that falls under any of the diagnostic categories listed in the mental and behavioral disorders chapter of the most recent edition of the World Health Organization’s
 International Statistical Classification of Diseases and Related Health Problems, or that is listed in the most recent version of the American Psychiatric Association’s Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders. Changes in terminology, organization, or classification of mental health and substance use disorders in future versions of the American Psychiatric Association’s Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders or the World Health Organization’s International Statistical Classification of Diseases and Related Health Problems shall not affect the conditions covered by this section as long as a condition is commonly understood to be a mental health or substance use disorder by health care providers practicing in relevant clinical specialties.

(3) (A) For purposes of this section, “medically
 necessary treatment of a mental health or substance use disorder” means a service or product addressing the specific needs of that patient, for the purpose of preventing, diagnosing, or treating an illness, injury, condition, or its symptoms, including minimizing the progression of an illness, injury, condition, or its symptoms, in a manner that is all of the following:

(i) In accordance with the generally accepted standards of mental health and substance use disorder care.

(ii) Clinically appropriate in terms of type, frequency, extent, site, and duration.

(iii) Not primarily for the economic benefit of the disability insurer and insureds or for the convenience of the patient, treating physician, or other health
 care provider.

(B) This paragraph does not limit in any way the independent medical review rights of an insured or policyholder under this chapter.

(4) “Health care provider” means any of the following:

(A) A person who is licensed under Division 2 (commencing with Section 500) of the Business and Professions Code.

(B) An associate marriage and family therapist or marriage and family therapist trainee functioning pursuant to Section 4980.43.3 of the Business and Professions Code.

(C) A qualified autism service provider certified by a national entity as defined in Section 4999.200 of the Business and Professions
 Code or a qualified autism service professional as defined in Section 4999.201 of the Business and Professions Code.

(D) An associate clinical social worker functioning pursuant to Section 4996.23.2 of the Business and Professions Code.

(E) An associate professional clinical counselor or professional clinical counselor trainee functioning pursuant to Section 4999.46.3 of the Business and Professions Code.

(F) A registered psychologist, as described in Section 2909.5 of the Business and Professions Code.

(G) A registered psychological assistant, as described in Section 2913 of the Business and Professions Code.

(H) A
 psychology trainee or person supervised as set forth in Section 2910 or 2911 of, or subdivision (d) of Section 2914 of, the Business and Professions Code.

(5) For purposes of this section, “generally accepted standards of mental health and substance use disorder care” has the same meaning as defined in paragraph (1) of subdivision (f) of Section 10144.52.

(6) A disability insurer shall not limit benefits or coverage for mental health and substance use disorders to short-term or acute treatment.

(7) All medical necessity determinations made by the disability insurer concerning service intensity, level of care placement, continued stay, and transfer or discharge of insureds diagnosed with mental health and substance
 use disorders shall be conducted in accordance with the requirements of Section 10144.52.

(8) A disability insurer that authorizes a specific type of treatment by a provider pursuant to this section shall not rescind or modify the authorization after the provider renders the health care service in good faith and pursuant to this authorization for any reason, including, but not limited to, the insurer’s subsequent rescission, cancellation, or modification of the insured’s or policyholder’s contract, or the insurer’s subsequent determination that it did not make an accurate determination of the insured’s or policyholder’s eligibility. This section shall not be construed to expand or alter the benefits available to the insured or policyholder under an insurance policy.

(b) The
 benefits that shall be covered pursuant to this section shall include, but not be limited to, the following:

(1) Basic health care services, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 1345 of the Health and Safety Code.

(2) Intermediate services, including the full range of levels of care, including, but not limited to, residential treatment, partial hospitalization, and intensive outpatient treatment.

(3) Prescription drugs, if the policy includes coverage for prescription drugs.

(c) The terms and conditions applied to the benefits required by this section, that shall be applied equally to all benefits under the disability insurance policy shall include, but not be
 limited to, all of the following patient financial responsibilities:

(1) Maximum and annual lifetime benefits, if not prohibited by applicable law.

(2) Copayments and coinsurance.

(3) Individual and family deductibles.

(4) Out-of-pocket maximums.

(d) If services for the medically necessary treatment of a mental health or substance use disorder are not available in network within the geographic and timely access standards set by law or regulation, the disability insurer shall arrange coverage to ensure the delivery of medically necessary out-of-network services and any medically necessary
 followup services that, to the maximum extent possible, meet those geographic and timely access standards. As used in this subdivision, to “arrange coverage to ensure the delivery of medically necessary out-of-network services” includes, but is not limited to, providing services to secure medically necessary out-of-network options that are available to the insured within geographic and timely access standards. The insured shall pay no more than the same cost sharing that the insured would pay for the same covered services received from an in-network provider.

(e) This section shall not apply to accident-only, specified disease, hospital indemnity, Medicare supplement, dental-only, or vision-only insurance policies.

(f) (1) For the purpose of compliance with this section,
 a disability insurer may provide coverage for all or part of the mental health and substance use disorder services required by this section through a separate specialized health insurance policy or mental health policy. This paragraph shall not apply to policies that are subject to Section 10112.27.

(2) A disability insurer shall provide the mental health and substance use disorder coverage required by this section in its entire service area and in emergency situations as may be required by applicable laws and regulations.  For purposes of this section, disability insurance policies that provide benefits to insureds through preferred provider contracting arrangements are not precluded from requiring insureds who reside or work in geographic areas served by specialized health insurance policies or mental health insurance policies to
 secure all or part of their mental health services within those geographic areas served by specialized health insurance policies or mental health insurance policies, provided that all appropriate mental health or substance use disorder services are actually available within those geographic service areas within timeliness standards.

(3) Notwithstanding any other law, in the provision of benefits required by this section, a disability insurer may utilize case management, network providers, utilization review techniques, prior authorization, copayments, or other cost sharing, provided that these practices are consistent with Section 10144.4 of this code, and Section 2052 of the Business and Professions Code.

(g) This section shall not be construed to deny or restrict in any way
 the department’s authority to ensure a disability insurer’s compliance with this code.

(h) A disability insurer shall not limit benefits or coverage for medically necessary services on the basis that those services should be or could be covered by a public entitlement program, including, but not limited to, special education or an individualized education program, Medicaid, Medicare, Supplemental Security Income, or Social Security Disability Insurance, and shall not include or enforce a contract term that excludes otherwise covered benefits on the basis that those services should be or could be covered by a public entitlement program.

(i) A disability insurer shall not adopt, impose, or enforce terms in its policies or provider agreements, in writing or in operation, that undermine,
 alter, or conflict with the requirements of this section.

(j) If the commissioner determines that a disability insurer has violated this section, the commissioner may, after appropriate notice and opportunity for hearing in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), by order, assess a civil penalty not to exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000) for each violation, or, if a violation was willful, a civil penalty not to exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000) for each violation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 413, Sec. 7.   (SB 402)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

10144.51.

(a) (1) Every health insurance policy shall also provide coverage for behavioral health treatment for pervasive developmental disorder or autism no later than July 1, 2012. The coverage shall be provided in the same manner and is subject to the same requirements as provided in Section 10144.5.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), as of the date that the proposed final rulemaking for essential health benefits is issued, this section does not require any benefits to be provided that exceed the essential health benefits that all health insurers will be required by federal regulations to provide under Section 1302(b) of the federal Patient Protection and Affordable Care
 Act (Public Law 111-148), as amended by the federal Health Care and Education Reconciliation Act of 2010 (Public Law 111-152).

(3) This section does not affect services for which an individual is eligible pursuant to Division 4.5 (commencing with Section 4500) of the Welfare and Institutions Code or Title 14 (commencing with Section 95000) of the Government Code.

(4) This section does not affect or reduce any obligation to provide services under an individualized education program, as defined in Section 56032 of the Education Code, or an individual service plan, as described in Section 5600.4 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, or under the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1400 et seq.) and its implementing regulations.

(b) Pursuant to Article 6 (commencing with Section 2240) of Subchapter 2 of Chapter 5 of Title 10 of the California Code of Regulations, every health insurer subject to this section shall maintain an adequate network that includes qualified autism service providers who supervise or employ qualified autism service professionals or paraprofessionals who provide and administer behavioral health treatment. A health insurer is not prevented from selectively contracting with providers within these requirements.

(c) (1) A health insurance policy issued, amended, or renewed on or after January 1, 2026, shall not require an insured previously diagnosed with pervasive developmental disorder or autism to receive a rediagnosis to maintain coverage for behavioral health treatment
 for pervasive developmental disorder or autism.

(2) This subdivision does not prohibit or restrict a treating provider from reevaluating an insured for purposes of determining the appropriate treatment. The treatment plan shall be made available to the insurer upon request.

(3) This subdivision does not prohibit a treating provider from prescribing a rediagnosis at the discretion of the physician licensed pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 2000) of Division 2 of the Business and Professions Code or a psychologist licensed
 pursuant to Chapter 6.6 (commencing with Section 2900) of Division 2 of the Business and Professions Code.

(4) A health insurer shall not discontinue or delay existing treatment while waiting for a rediagnosis to be completed.

(5) This subdivision does not prohibit a health insurer from requiring utilization review. For the purpose of this section, utilization review is distinct from a rediagnosis.

(d) For the purposes of this section, the following definitions shall apply:

(1) “Behavioral health treatment” means professional services and treatment programs, including applied behavior analysis and evidence-based behavior intervention programs, that
 develop or restore, to the maximum extent practicable, the functioning of an individual with pervasive developmental disorder or autism, and that meet all of the following criteria:

(A) The treatment is prescribed by a physician and surgeon licensed pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 2000) of, or is developed by a psychologist licensed pursuant to Chapter 6.6 (commencing with Section 2900) of, Division 2 of the Business and Professions Code.

(B) The treatment is provided under a treatment plan prescribed by a qualified autism service provider and is administered by one of the following:

(i) A qualified autism service provider.

(ii) A
 qualified autism service professional supervised by the qualified autism service provider.

(iii) A qualified autism service paraprofessional supervised by a qualified autism service provider or qualified autism service professional.

(C) The treatment plan has measurable goals over a specific timeline that is developed and approved by the qualified autism service provider for the specific patient being treated. The treatment plan shall be reviewed no less than once every six months by the qualified autism service provider and modified whenever appropriate, and shall be consistent with Section 4686.2 of the Welfare and Institutions Code pursuant to which the qualified autism service provider does all of the following:

(i) Describes the patient’s behavioral health impairments or developmental challenges that are to be treated.

(ii) Designs an intervention plan that includes the service type, number of hours, and parent participation needed to achieve the plan’s goal and objectives, and the frequency at which the patient’s progress is evaluated and reported.

(iii) Provides intervention plans that utilize evidence-based practices, with demonstrated clinical efficacy in treating pervasive developmental disorder or autism.

(iv) Discontinues intensive behavioral intervention services when the treatment goals and objectives are achieved or no longer appropriate.

(D) The treatment plan is not used for purposes of providing or for the reimbursement of respite, daycare, or educational services and is not used to reimburse a parent for participating in the treatment program. The treatment plan shall be made available to the insurer upon request.

(2) “Qualified autism service provider” means an individual described in Section 4999.200 of the Business and Professions Code.

(3) “Qualified autism service professional” means an individual who meets all of the criteria set forth in Section 4999.201 of the Business and Professions Code.

(4) “Qualified autism service paraprofessional” means an unlicensed and uncertified individual who meets all of the criteria set
 forth in Section 4999.202 of the Business and Professions Code.

(5) “Rediagnosis” means a subsequent undertaking by any method, device, or procedure, whether gratuitous or not, to ascertain or establish if a person is suffering from a physical or mental health disorder, pursuant to Section 2038 of the Business and Professions Code. “Rediagnosis” also means prescription of a subsequent diagnosis of pervasive developmental disorders or autism to ascertain or establish if a person is suffering from a pervasive developmental disorder or autism.

(6) “Utilization review” means utilization review or utilization management functions that prospectively, retrospectively, or concurrently review and approve, modify, or deny, based in whole or in part on medical necessity to cure and relieve,
 treatment recommendations by physicians licensed pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 2000) of Division 2 of the Business and Professions Code before, after, or concurrent with the provision of medical treatment services. “Utilization review” refers to an evaluation of existing treatment to ensure the insured receives the proper care at the proper time.

(e) This section does not apply to either of the following:

(1) A specialized health insurance policy that does not cover mental health or behavioral health services or an accident-only, specified disease, hospital indemnity, or Medicare supplement policy.

(2) A health insurance policy in the Medi-Cal program (Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 14000) of Part
 3 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code).

(f) This section does not limit the obligation to provide services under Section 10144.5.

(g) As provided in Section 10144.5 and in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a), in the provision of benefits required by this section, a health insurer may utilize case management, network providers, utilization review techniques, prior authorization, copayments, or other cost sharing.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 413, Sec. 8.5.   (SB 402)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

10144.52.

(a) A disability insurer that provides hospital, medical, or surgical coverage shall base any medical necessity determination or the utilization review criteria that the insurer, and any entity acting on the insurer’s behalf, applies to determine the medical necessity of health care services and benefits for the diagnosis, prevention, and treatment of mental health and substance use disorders on current generally accepted standards of mental health and substance use disorder care.

(b) In conducting utilization review of all covered health care services and benefits for the diagnosis, prevention, and treatment of mental health and substance use disorders in children, adolescents,
 and adults, a disability insurer shall apply the criteria and guidelines set forth in the most recent versions of the treatment criteria developed by the nonprofit professional association for the relevant clinical specialty.

(c) In conducting utilization review involving level of care placement decisions or any other patient care decisions that are within the scope of the sources specified in subdivision (b), a disability insurer shall not apply different, additional, conflicting, or more restrictive utilization review criteria than the criteria and guidelines set forth in those sources. This subdivision does not prohibit a disability insurer from applying utilization review criteria to health care services and benefits for mental health and substance use disorders that meet either of the following criteria:

(1) Are outside the scope of the criteria and guidelines set forth in the sources specified in subdivision (b), provided the utilization review criteria were developed in accordance with subdivision (a).

(2) Relate to advancements in technology or types of care that are not covered in the most recent versions of the sources specified in subdivision (b), provided that the utilization review criteria were developed in accordance with subdivision (a).

(d) If a disability insurer purchases or licenses utilization review criteria pursuant to paragraph (1) or (2) of subdivision (c), the insurer shall verify and document before use that the criteria were developed in accordance with subdivision (a).

(e) To ensure the proper use of the criteria described in subdivision (b), every disability insurer shall do all of the following:

(1) Sponsor a formal education program by nonprofit clinical specialty associations to educate the disability insurer’s staff, including any third parties contracted with the disability insurer to review claims, conduct utilization reviews, or make medical necessity determinations about the clinical review criteria.

(2) Make the education program available to other stakeholders, including the insurer’s participating providers and covered lives.

(3) Provide, at no cost, the clinical review criteria and any training material or resources
 to providers and insured patients.

(4) Track, identify, and analyze how the clinical review criteria are used to certify care, deny care, and support the appeals process.

(5) Conduct interrater reliability testing to ensure consistency in utilization review decisionmaking covering how medical necessity decisions are made. This assessment shall cover all aspects of utilization review as defined in paragraph (3) of subdivision (f).

(6) Run interrater reliability reports about how the clinical guidelines are used in conjunction with the utilization management process and parity compliance activities.

(7) Achieve interrater reliability pass rates of at least 90 percent and,
 if this threshold is not met, immediately provide for the remediation of poor interrater reliability and interrater reliability testing for all new staff before they can conduct utilization review without supervision.

(f) The following definitions apply for purposes of this section:

(1) “Generally accepted standards of mental health and substance use disorder care” means standards of care and clinical practice that are generally recognized by health care providers practicing in relevant clinical specialties such as psychiatry, psychology, clinical sociology, addiction medicine and counseling, and behavioral health treatment pursuant to Section 10144.51. Valid, evidence-based sources establishing generally accepted standards of mental health and substance use disorder care
 include peer-reviewed scientific studies and medical literature, clinical practice guidelines and recommendations of nonprofit health care provider professional associations, specialty societies and federal government agencies, and drug labeling approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration.

(2) “Mental health and substance use disorders” has the same meaning as defined in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 10144.5.

(3) “Utilization review” means either of the following:

(A) Prospectively, retrospectively, or concurrently reviewing and approving, modifying, delaying, or denying, based in whole or in part on medical necessity, requests by health care providers,
 insureds, or their authorized representatives for coverage of health care services prior to, retrospectively or concurrent with the provision of health care services to insureds.

(B) Evaluating the medical necessity, appropriateness, level of care, service intensity, efficacy, or efficiency of health care services, benefits, procedures, or settings, under any circumstances, to determine whether a health care service or benefit subject to a medical necessity coverage requirement in a disability insurance policy is covered as medically necessary for an insured.

(4) “Utilization review criteria” means any criteria, standards, protocols, or guidelines used by a disability insurer to conduct utilization review.

(g) This section applies to all health care services and benefits for the diagnosis, prevention, and treatment of mental health and substance use disorders covered by a disability insurance policy, including prescription drugs.

(h) This section applies to a disability insurer that covers hospital, medical, or surgical expenses and conducts utilization review as defined in this section, and any entity or contracting provider that performs utilization review or utilization management
 functions on an insurer’s behalf.

(i) If the commissioner determines that a disability insurer has violated this section, the commissioner may, after appropriate notice and opportunity for hearing in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), by order, assess a civil penalty not to exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000) for each violation, or, if a violation was willful, a civil penalty not to exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000) for each violation.

(j) A disability insurer shall not adopt, impose, or enforce terms in its policies or provider agreements, in writing or in operation, that undermine, alter, or conflict with the requirements of this
 section.

(k) This section does not apply to accident-only, specified disease, hospital indemnity, Medicare supplement, dental-only, or vision-only insurance policies.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 151, Sec. 8.   (SB 855)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

10144.53.

(a) (1) A disability insurance policy issued, amended, renewed, or delivered on or after January 1, 2024, that is required to provide coverage for medically necessary treatment of mental health and substance use disorders pursuant to Sections 10144.5, 10144.51, and 10144.52 shall cover the provision of the services identified in the fee-for-service reimbursement schedule published by the State Department of Health Care Services, as described in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (5) of subdivision (c), when those services are delivered at schoolsites pursuant to this section, regardless of the network status of the local educational agency, institution of higher education, or health care provider.

(2) This section does not relieve a local
 educational agency or institution of higher education from requirements to accommodate or provide services to students with disabilities pursuant to any applicable state and federal law, including, but not limited to, the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1400 et seq.), Part 30 (commencing with Section 56000) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Education Code, Chapter 26.5 (commencing with Section 7570) of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code, and Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 3000) of Division 1 of Title 5 of the California Code of Regulations.

(b) The following definitions apply for purposes of this section:

(1) “Health care provider” has the same meaning as defined in paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 10144.5 and paragraph (5) of subdivision (c) of Section 10144.51.

(2) “Institution of higher education” means the California Community Colleges, the California State University, or the University of California.

(3) “Local educational agency” means a school district, county office of education, charter school, the California Schools for the Deaf, and the California School for the Blind.

(4) “Medically necessary treatment of a mental health or substance use disorder” has the same meaning as defined in paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 10144.5.

(5) “Mental health and substance use disorders” has the same meaning as defined in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 10144.5.

(6) “Schoolsite” means a facility or location used for public kindergarten, elementary, secondary, or postsecondary
 purposes. “Schoolsite” also includes a location not owned or operated by a public school, or public school district if the school or school district provides or arranges for the provision of medically necessary treatment of a mental health or substance use disorder to its students at that location, including off-campus clinics, mobile counseling services, and similar locations.

(7) “Utilization review” has the same meaning as defined in paragraph (3) of subdivision (f) of Section 10144.52.

(c) If a local educational agency or institution of higher education provides or arranges for the provision of treatment of a mental health or substance use disorder services subject to this section by a health care provider at a schoolsite for an individual 25 years of age or younger, the student’s disability insurer shall reimburse the local educational agency or institution of higher
 education for those services.
